Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1658XS (1) 91 lh/ko S.F. 216 Section 1. STATEWIDE DEMENTIA CARE COORDINATOR ââ DEMENTIA 1 CARE SPECIALISTS ââ APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from 2 the general fund of the state to the department of health and 3 human services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 4 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 5 as is necessary, for the purposes designated: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 7 The funds appropriated in this section shall be used by the 8 department of health and human services to employ a statewide 9 dementia care coordinator within the department, and to provide 10 grants to each area agency on aging to employ a dementia care 11 specialist in each area agency on aging. 12